North Carolina, session 2025, HB416.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Boys & Girls Clubs of Durham and
Orange Counties. These funds shall be used to offer area boys and girls its comprehensive six-part
curriculum comprised of the following: (i) Recruiting and Retaining Teens, (ii) Emotional Safety,
(iii) Youth as Leaders, (iv) Trauma-Informed Practices, (v) Cultural Responsiveness and
Inclusion, and (vi) College and Career Readiness.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H416-v-1*